Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.135

Leases of county property—Affordable housing.

If a county owns property that is located anywhere within the county, including within the limits of a city or town, and that is suitable for affordable housing, the legislative authority of the county may, by negotiation, lease the property for affordable housing for a term not to exceed seventy-five years to any public housing authority or nonprofit organization that has demonstrated its ability to construct or operate housing for very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households as defined in RCW 43.63A.510 and special needs populations. Leases for housing for very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households and special needs populations shall not be subject to any requirement of periodic rental adjustments, as provided in RCW 36.34.180, but shall provide for such fixed annual rents as appear reasonable considering the public, social, and health benefits to be derived by providing an adequate supply of safe and sanitary housing for very low-income, low-income, or moderate-income households and special needs populations.

[ 1993 c 461 s 6; 1990 c 253 s 7.]

NOTES:

Finding—1993 c 461: See note following RCW 43.63A.510.

Legislative finding and purpose—1990 c 253: See note following RCW 43.70.340.